Illinois, session 104th, HB4434.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5adding Section 3-2-15.1 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-2-15.1 new)7    Sec. 3-2-15.1. Department of Corrections; End-of-life Care 8Peer Support Program.9    (a) References. This Section may be referred to as 10Humanizing End-of-Life Care for People in Prison.11    (b) Legislative findings. The General Assembly finds that:12        (1) A significant number of people in the Department 13    of Corrections are aging, experiencing terminal illnesses, 14    or dying.15        (2) According to the Department's 2024 Annual Report, 16    the Department incarcerates the following populations of 17    aging people:18            (A) 3,002 individuals between the ages of 55 and 19        64.20            (B) 1,045 individuals between the ages of 65 and 21        74.22            (C) 206 individuals between the ages of 75 and 90.23        (3) As a result of the aging prison population, more   HB4434 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 18059 RLC 31498 b1    incarcerated persons are in need of end-of-life care and 2    support services.3        (4) Prison is disabling and contributes to accelerated 4    aging due to inadequate healthcare, high-stress 5    environments, and lack of physical movement or cognitive 6    stimuli.7        (5) Mass incarceration is a public health crisis.8        (6) People in prison and returning home after 9    incarceration, on average, have higher healthcare needs.10            (A) The Bureau of Justice Statistics found that, 11        in 2011, 44 percent of people who are incarcerated had 12        a mental health disorder.13            (B) Compared to the general population, both men 14        and women who are incarcerated are more likely to have 15        high blood pressure, asthma, cancer, arthritis, and 16        infectious diseases, such as tuberculosis, hepatitis 17        C, and HIV.18            (C) Women who have been incarcerated are 19        disproportionately likely to suffer from conditions 20        such as tuberculosis, hepatitis, and high blood 21        pressure, and are at greater risk for several 22        infectious diseases, such as HIV/AIDS, HPV, and other 23        sexually transmitted diseases.24        (7) People in State prisons often suffer from unmet 25    health needs which lead to medical complications and 26    premature and preventable deaths.  HB4434 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 18059 RLC 31498 b1        (8) Comprehensive end-of-life care requires approaches 2    that are patient-centered and family-centered; 3    peer-to-peer; inclusive; and accountable to patients and 4    their families.5        (9) The Department has some end-of-life services in a 6    few facilities; rather, end-of-life care is provided on a 7    prison-by-prison basis which results in coordinated care 8    for some individuals in custody who have been diagnosed 9    with terminal illnesses or who are expected to reach the 10    end of their life.11            (A) The Department's existing end-of-life care 12        program is, in part, provided by other incarcerated 13        individuals.14            (B) The Department's existing end-of-life care 15        programs are not available to incarcerated women.16        (10) Peer-to-peer hospice programs can significantly 17    benefit the lives of not only participants but also 18    incarcerated volunteers by bringing value to their own 19    lives, providing an opportunity for penance for past 20    offenses through service to others, and developing healthy 21    coping mechanisms to feelings of loss and grief.22        (11) Because peer-to-peer programs positively benefit 23    volunteers, decreases in recidivism rates can be expected 24    for those who complete the program.25        (12) The nation is facing a looming care worker 26    shortage.  HB4434 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 18059 RLC 31498 b1        (13) Peer-to-peer hospice program volunteers can 2    utilize their skills to achieve employment and a career 3    path following release while providing much needed care 4    support.5    (c) Purposes.6        (1) This Section establishes a peer-to-peer, 7    non-medical, end-of-life care program in the Department to 8    provide care to individuals in custody who are diagnosed 9    with a terminal illness or medical incapacitation.10        (2) This program shall expand and formalize the 11    Department's existing Assisted Living Attendant Program 12    and shall ensure that people dying in the Department 13    receive patient-directed, peer-provided, dignified 14    end-of-life care.15        (3) This program shall work in conjunction with prison 16    medical and correctional staff and shall not replace or 17    impede upon any medical staff or services.18    (d) Definitions. As used in this Section:19        (1) "Terminal illness" means a condition that 20    satisfies all of the following criteria, as defined in 21    3-3-14:22            (A) The condition is irreversible and incurable.23            (B) In accordance with medical standards and a 24        reasonable degree of medical certainty, based on an 25        individual assessment, the condition is likely to 26        cause death within 18 months.  HB4434 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 18059 RLC 31498 b1        (2) "Medically incapacitated" means an individual in 2    custody has any diagnosable medical condition, including 3    dementia and severe, permanent medical or cognitive 4    disability, that prevents the individual in custody from 5    completing more than one activity of daily living without 6    assistance or that incapacitates the individual in custody 7    to the extent that institutional confinement does not 8    offer additional restrictions, and that the condition is 9    unlikely to improve noticeably in the future.10        (3) "End-of-life care" means support services that 11    address the physical, social, spiritual, psychological and 12    emotional needs of those that are dying who are in the 13    custody of the Department of Corrections.14        (4) "Peer support attendant" means a companion and 15    assistant to individuals in custody who are diagnosed with 16    a terminal illness or who have compromised functioning as 17    the result of a chronic medical illness.18    (e) Program requirements.19        (1) The program shall be called the End-of-life Care 20    Peer Support Program.21        (2) The program shall be administered by the 22    Department in partnership with the following entities:23            (A) Hospice organizations.24            (B) Centers for independent living and other 25        disability organizations.26            (C) Prison hospice organizations.  HB4434 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 18059 RLC 31498 b1            (D) Community clergy.2            (E) Licensed clinical social workers.3            (F) Behavioral therapists.4            (G) Translation services, including both spoken 5        and unspoken languages.6        (3) The scope of the program's services shall cover 7    the following:8            (A) Services shall be provided 24 hours per day, 7 9        days per week.10            (B) Recognizing the uniqueness of each facility, 11        services shall be available in each facility that 12        houses aging or medically vulnerable populations, 13        including, but not limited to, the following 14        correctional centers: Big Muddy, Centralia, Danville, 15        Decatur, Dixon, Fox Valley, Graham, Hill, Illinois 16        River, Lawrence, Menard, Pinckneyville, Pontiac, 17        Taylorville, and Western Illinois. The Department 18        shall ensure transfer and transportation of all 19        individuals that require end-of-life care to a 20        facility that offers the program.21            (C) Wherever possible, and subject to internal 22        security rules, incarcerated individuals receiving 23        end-of-life care shall be granted special privileges 24        including additional opportunities for visitation and 25        communication, with increased access to 26        non-incarcerated family and friends and incarcerated   HB4434 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 18059 RLC 31498 b1        peers.2            (D) All care shall be coordinated at monthly 3        meetings, with weekly meetings as necessary, with an 4        interdisciplinary team including the following:5                (i) Facility Medical Director or 6            Hospice/Palliative Program Coordinator, or both.7                (ii) Nursing staff.8                (iii) Mental health professionals.9                (iv) Clergy or chaplain.10                (v) Peer support attendants.11                (vi) Food service manager or managers.12                (vii) Family.13            (E) Placement or transfer of eligible patients 14        into medical wings or facilities which host the 15        program, or both.16            (F) Peer supported attendant assisted tasks shall 17        include, but are not limited to, the following:18                (i) Housekeeping tasks such as cleaning, 19            laundry, stocking hygiene supplies, dusting, 20            ensuring physical safe spaces.21                (ii) Assistance with hygiene; body 22            positioning; using electric bed controls; 23            non-medical feeding support; mobility support; 24            grooming; changing clothes; assisting medical 25            staff with bed baths and showering; and other 26            tasks as needed and designated by the Medical   HB4434 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 18059 RLC 31498 b1            Director.2                (iii) Clerical assistance, including letter 3            writing; commissary lists; request slips; support 4            with medical requests and directives; financial 5            documents, final remarks, and filing grievances.6                (iv) Facilitated communication with family, 7            counselors, and spiritual leaders.8                (v) Support of cultural practices, rituals, 9            and beliefs as requested by patients.10        (4) Individuals in custody shall be eligible to 11    participate as patients in the program if they meet any 12    one or a combination of the following:13            (A) Diagnosis with a terminal illness.14            (B) Medical incapacitation due to illness or 15        injury.16            (C) Eligibility for compassionate release, 17        including while awaiting release which has been 18        approved by the Prison Review Board.19        (5) Individuals in custody shall be eligible to 20    participate as peer support attendants in the program if 21    they complete the following:22            (A) Submit an Offender Request Slip to the 23        Assistant Warden of Programs or the Assistant Warden's 24        designee.25                (i) The Assistant Warden of Programs shall 26            evaluate the individuals' security status. If the   HB4434 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 18059 RLC 31498 b1            individual does not pose a clear risk to safety 2            and security, the individual shall be eligible for 3            participation in the program.4                (ii) The Assistant Warden of Programs or the 5            Assistant Warden's designee shall provide, in 6            writing, an explanation regarding any decision to 7            deny an individual access to the program, 8            including a specific reason as to why they were 9            denied.10            (B) Participation in the program shall be 11        voluntary.12            (C) Peer support attendants shall reflect the 13        diversity of the individuals in custody served, 14        whenever possible.15        (6) Training shall be provided to all peer support 16    attendants as follows:17            (A) All peer support attendants shall receive 18        hospice and adult care volunteer training upon 19        entrance into the program.20            (B) Peer support attendants shall receive 21        continuing training and education on end-of-life care, 22        appropriate to the peer support attendants' 23        responsibilities.24            (C) Trainings shall include information on the 25        following topics:26                (i) Trauma-informed care.  HB4434 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 18059 RLC 31498 b1                (ii) ADA accommodations and support.2                (iii) Cultural competency and LGBTQIA+ 3            affirming care.4                (iv) Active listening.5                (v) Grief and loss support.6                (vi) Confidentiality and boundaries.7                (vii) Elder care and comfort.8                (viii) Caregiving in a correctional setting.9            (D) Peer support attendants shall receive earned 10        program sentence credits for each day of training in 11        which they participate. Peer support attendants shall 12        also receive certifications as appropriate based on 13        their completed training.14        (7) The program shall center patients' needs, as 15    defined below:16            (A) Individual patients may accept or decline care 17        or participation in the program. Individual patients 18        shall define the scope of peer support, including the 19        option to opt out of certain aspects of support.20            (B) Patient care plans shall be developed with the 21        individual patient, the patient's peer support 22        attendants, and the interdisciplinary team defined in 23        subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subsection (e).24                (i) Patient care plans shall incorporate 25            culturally and disability-competent expertise and 26            address patients' spiritual needs.  HB4434 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 18059 RLC 31498 b1                (ii) Patient care plans shall be considerate 2            of both patient and family goals for care, while 3            prioritizing the patient's goals.4            (C) Patients eligible for participation in the 5        program shall receive services as soon as practicable 6        under the circumstances.7            (D) Patients' medical privacy shall be ensured 8        throughout the entirety of their participation in the 9        program.10            (E) Individual patients may choose whether to 11        release medical or end-of-life care status, or both, 12        to their family members. If patients so choose, the 13        Department must assist patients in completing advanced 14        healthcare directives and assigning powers of 15        attorney.16            (F) To the extent possible, participating patients 17        shall have the right to medically accessible, 18        temperature-regulated housing units which are 19        appropriate for their mobility and communication 20        needs.21            (G) Participating patients shall be subject to the 22        least restrictive security measures possible, with 23        access to comfort items such as blankets, memorabilia, 24        music, and books.25        (8) The program shall follow the reporting 26    requirements outlined in Section 3-2-15, the Eddie Thomas   HB4434 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 18059 RLC 31498 b1    Act.2    (f) Additional protections.3        (1) Participating patients shall have the following 4    rights:5            (A) Right to dignity, privacy, respect, and 6        culturally competent care.7            (B) Right to request peer support services.8            (C) Right to refuse services.9            (D) Right to request family visitation.10        (2) Peer support attendants shall be protected from 11    retaliatory actions in response to participating in the 12    program or reporting issues related to the program or 13    delivery of health care. Retaliatory actions include but 14    are not limited to verbal abuse, restrictive housing 15    assignments, denial of medical or mental health care, 16    physical assault, transfers to harsher facilities, or 17    revocation of privileges such as phone calls, visits, 18    commissary, day room opportunities, or yard time.19        (3) All participants in the program, including 20    patients and peer support attendants, shall have access to 21    grief counseling and mental health care services as 22    needed.23        (4) The Department must provide a grievance process 24    for incarcerated individuals and their families to report 25    abuse, bias, coercion, discrimination, or other adverse 26    actions that are not in accordance with this Section.  HB4434 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 18059 RLC 31498 b1    (g) Funding. This program shall be funded through:2        (1) the Individual Benefit Fund; and 3        (2) federal appropriations if applicable.